District of Columbia statutes.
22-1837

Penalties.

(a)

(1)

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, whoever violates § 22-1832, § 22-1833, or § 22-1834 shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned for not more than 20 years, or both.

(2)

Whoever violates sections § 22-1832, § 22-1833, or § 22-1834 when the victim is held or provides services for more than 180 days shall be fined not more than 11/2 times the maximum fine authorized for the designated act, imprisoned for not more than 11/2 times the maximum term authorized for the designated act, or both.

(b)

Whoever violates § 22-1835 shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned for not more than 5 years, or both.

(c)

Whoever violates § 22-1836 shall be fined or imprisoned up to the maximum fine or term of imprisonment for a violation of each referenced section.

(d)

Whoever attempts to violate § 22-1832, § 22-1833, § 22-1834, § 22-1835 or § 22-1836 shall be fined not more than 1/2 the maximum fine otherwise authorized for the offense, imprisoned for not more than 1/2 the maximum term otherwise authorized for the offense, or both.

(e)

No person shall be sentenced consecutively for violations of §§ 22-1833 and 22-1834 for an offense arising out of the same incident.

History

Oct. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-239, § 107, 57 DCR 5405
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 224, 60 DCR 2064

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $200,000” in (a)(1), and for “not more than $5,000” in (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 224 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.